Hawaii statutes.
[§149A-15.5] Pesticide
information signs. (a) Every retailer that sells pesticides to the public
shall post a warning sign with respect to the sale of pesticides, pursuant to
rules adopted by the department; provided that retailers may post the warning
sign or place the warning sign at the product display areas.

(b) The department shall adopt rules pursuant
to chapter 91 and subsection (a) to require the posting of pesticide warning
signs containing but not limited to the following information:

(1) The proper handling, storage, and disposal of all
pesticides sold;

(2) Emergency telephone numbers to call in case of
poisoning from the pesticides; and

(3) Any other related information the department
deems helpful and appropriate for consumers.

The department may also adopt any other rules
pursuant to chapter 91 necessary to effectuate this section, including rules
relating to the size and placement of warning signs. [L 2007, c 174, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next